Massachusetts, session 194th, H1502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 31. (a) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall, subject to
appropriation, establish and operate a program to provide assistance to seniors and persons with
disabilities to make accessibility modifications to their primary residence.
(b) The secretary of the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
promulgate rules and regulations to establish the requirements and standards for the program.
of 1